src/fst/phonology.twolc
!2012-11-18! ! Stem vowel loss before plural "i"
!2012-11-18! "StemVowLoss"
!2012-11-18!  X:Y <=> X _  %> i  %> ;
!2012-11-18! !( %>  %^WCns:0 |  %>  %^LCns:0 ) %> [ i | i:j ] ;
!2012-11-18!           where X in (e o ö)
!2012-11-18!                 Y in (0 0 0) matched ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! A loss
!2012-11-18! "StemALoss"
!2012-11-18!  X:Y <=>  _   ( %> %^LCns:0 ) %> i: %> ;
!2012-11-18!           where X in (a ä)
!2012-11-18!                 Y in (0 0) matched ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !!€# osa%>^WCns%>i%>st
!2012-11-18! !!€0 os0000i0st
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !%>%^LCnsi%>V1
!2012-11-18! ! AÄ1 loss
!2012-11-18! "StemAÄLoss"
!2012-11-18!  AÄ1:0 <=> [ AÄ1: | Cns: | :Cns ] _ ( %> %^LCns:0 ) %> i %> ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! U loss [u:0 | ü:0]
!2012-11-18! "StemULoss"
!2012-11-18!  X:Y <=> X _ %>  i  %> ;
!2012-11-18! ! ( %>  %^WCns:0 |  %>  %^LCns:0 ) %> i %> ;
!2012-11-18!          [ e | ä | a | o | ö ] _  [ t: | k: ] 0:v ;
!2012-11-18!           where X in (u ü)
!2012-11-18!                 Y in (0 0) matched ;
!2012-11-18! !Vow:0 %>  %^WCns:0 %> i: %> 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !!€# maa%>i%>n
!2012-11-18! !!€0 ma00i0n
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Stem vowel "i" loss before plural "i"
!2012-11-18! "i:Zero"
!2012-11-18!  i:0 <=> i _ %> i  %> ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! iToj between vowels
!2012-11-18! "i:j"
!2012-11-18!  i:j <=> :Vow ( %>  %^LCns:0 ) %> _ %> :Vow ;
!2012-11-18!          Vow _ Cns:0 Vow: ;
!2012-11-18! !veitte%>%^WCnsttUY1%>%^LCns%>i%>AÄ1
!2012-11-18! !!€# em0o0i%>%^LCnsAÄ1
!2012-11-18! !!€0 emmooj00a
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! a to e in comparatives
!2012-11-18! "a:e"
!2012-11-18!  a:e <=> _ %> %^WCns:0 %^E1:0 ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! ä to e in comparatives
!2012-11-18! "ä:e"
!2012-11-18!  ä:e <=> _ %> %^WCns:0 %^E1:0 ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Front
!2012-11-18! "AÄ1:ä"
!2012-11-18!  AÄ1:ä <=> FT _  ( %>  %^WCns:0 ( %^LVow:0 ) |  %^LVow:0  |  %>  %^LCns:0 ( %^LVow:0 ) ) [ ( %> ) [ Cns | %> %^WCns:0 [ Cns ] | [[ Vow: ] - [ i | i:j ]]] | # | AÄ1: | %^StretchSyll2:0 | i | %> ( %^WCns:0 | %^LCns:0 ) [ V1: | V3: ] ]  ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! mato : mattooa
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!2012-11-18! "AÄ1:a"
!2012-11-18!  AÄ1:a <=> BT _   ( %>  %^WCns:0 ( %^LVow:0 ) |  %^LVow:0  |  %>  %^LCns:0 ( %^LVow:0 ) ) [ ( %> ) [ Cns | %> %^WCns:0 [ Cns ] | [[ Vow: ] - [ i | i:j ]]] | # | AÄ1: | %^StretchSyll2:0 | i | %> ( %^WCns:0 | %^LCns:0 ) [ V1: | V3: ] ]  ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Front
!2012-11-18! "OÖ1:ö"
!2012-11-18!  OÖ1:ö <=>  FT _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!2012-11-18! "OÖ1:o"
!2012-11-18!  OÖ1:o <=>  BT _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Front
!2012-11-18! "UY1:y"
!2012-11-18!  UY1:y <=>  FT _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!2012-11-18! "UY1:u"
!2012-11-18!  UY1:u <=>  BT _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Vow %> %^LCns: V1:
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel agreement in illative 
!2012-11-18! "V1:aeouüäö"
!2012-11-18!  V1:Vx <=> :Vx %> [ h | ( %^LCns: %> ) ] _ ;
!2012-11-18!         where Vx in (a o u ä ö ü) ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel agreement in illative e
!2012-11-18! "V1:e"
!2012-11-18!  V1:e <=> [ e | i ] %>  h  _ ;
!2012-11-18!           e ( %> %^LCns: ) %>  _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Illative i with no intermittent _h_
!2012-11-18! "V1:i"
!2012-11-18!  V1:i <=> i ( %> %^LCns: ) %> _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !  _mato:maool_ not allowed
!2012-11-18! ! Used with patsas type nominals
!2012-11-18! "V2:aeiouüäö"
!2012-11-18!  V2:Vx <=>  Vx ( h ( :h ) ) %>  ( %^LCns:0 )  _ [ V2: | ( %> ([ %^WCns:0 | %^LCns:0 ] ( V3: ) ) )  Cns ] ;
!2012-11-18!             Vx ( h ( :h ) ) %>  ( %^LCns:0 | %^WCns:0 ) V2: _ [ ( %> )  Cns ]  ;
!2012-11-18!         where Vx in (a o u ä ö ü e i) ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V2:Zero"
!2012-11-18!  V2:0 <=> Vow %> _ %> i: %> ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !FROM HERE
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel lengthening for the inesive and adessive with V3
!2012-11-18! ! This deals with secondary or perhaps pertary vowel lengthening
!2012-11-18! ! e.g. gen plural, ine, ade
!2012-11-18! "V3:a"
!2012-11-18!  V3:a <=> :Cns :0* :a :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:e"
!2012-11-18!  V3:e <=> :Cns :0* :e :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:i"
!2012-11-18!  V3:i <=> :Cns :0* :i :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:o"
!2012-11-18!  V3:o <=> :Cns :0* :o :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:u"
!2012-11-18!  V3:u <=> :Cns :0* :u :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:ä"
!2012-11-18!  V3:ä <=> :Cns :0* :ä :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:ö"
!2012-11-18!  V3:ö <=> :Cns :0* :ö :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:ü"
!2012-11-18!  V3:ü <=> :Cns :0* :ü :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "V3:Zero"
!2012-11-18!  V3:0 <=> :Vow :0* :Vow :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! ! Vowel Lengthening
!2012-11-18! ! mato : mattoon,
!2012-11-18!  "Zero:Vx"
!2012-11-18!  0:Vx <=> ( Vow+ :Cns+ ) Vx _ %> ( %^LCns: | %^WCns:0 ) %^LVow: ;
!2012-11-18!           # Cns* Vow [ Cns 0: | 0:i j ] Vx _ Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vow %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! ommeena<omena
!2012-11-18! ! 
!2012-11-18!          [ # ] Cns* Vow Cns 0: Vx _ Cns :0 Vow [ Cns | [ # ] ] ;
!2012-11-18!        where Vx in (a o u ä ö ü e) ; 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Secondary Consonant lengthening
!2012-11-18! ! mato : mattoo, näytettävä : näytettävvää
!2012-11-18! !"even-syllable" This should be secondary
!2012-11-18! "consonant lengthening"
!2012-11-18!  0:Cx <=> 
!2012-11-18!          [ # Cns* Vow+ Cns:+ Vow+ :0* Cns+ :Vow ( %> %^LCns:0 ) | # Cns*  Vow | %^OddSyll:0 ] Cx _ ( [ Vow: | :Vow ] ( :Vow ) ) %> %^LCns:0 ; !
!2012-11-18!          # Cns* Vow Cx _ [ Vow 0: Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vow | Vow %^SyllBr:0 e ] %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! ommeena<omena ; venät:vennäen
!2012-11-18!            where Cx in (m p t s n r l k g h) ;
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! ! oja: oija
!2012-11-18! "j lengthening"
!2012-11-18! 0:i <=> [ # ] Cns* Vow _ j Vow ( 0: ) %> %^LCns:0  ;
!2012-11-18!           [ [ :Cns | :Cns Vow:0 ] ( %> ) | Cns: ] i _ %> ( %^LCns: | %^WCns:0 ) %^LVow: ;
!2012-11-18!          [ # ] Cns* Vow Cns 0: i _ Cns :0 Vow [ Cns | [ # ] ] ;
!2012-11-18!          # Cns* Vow _ j [ Vow 0: Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vow | Vow %^SyllBr:0 e ] %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! ommeena<omena ; venät:vennäen, kaijaava
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !TO HERE
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! ! Consonant weakening !
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! ! t:0, k:0 (suku:suun), p:v, ht:h, hk:h, lt:ll, rt:rr
!2012-11-18! ! mp:mm, nt:nn, st:ss,
!2012-11-18! ! it:ij, lk:l, rk:r, nk:ng, sk:s, tk:t, 
!2012-11-18! ! kk:k, tt:t, pp:p
!2012-11-18! ! ut:vv, üt:vv (uut:uuvv), uk:vv
!2012-11-18! ! aika:ajan, poika:pojan, reikä:reijän, liika:liijan
!2012-11-18! ! lp:lv, rp:rv
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "Ut:vv Uk:vv weakening"
!2012-11-18!  Cx:Cy <=> [ # ] Cns* Vow [ u: | ü: ] _ 0:v [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18!               where Cx in (k t)
!2012-11-18!                     Cy in (v v) matched ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "0:v Lengthening with Ut:vv weakening"
!2012-11-18!  0:v <=> [ # ] Cns* Vow [ u: | ü: ] [ t: | k: ]  _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18!          [ # ][ Cns* Vow | Cns* Vow+ Cns:+ Vow+ :0* Cns+ :Vow ] v _  ( :Vow | AÄ1: ) [ 0:Vow %> %^LCns: | %> %^LCns: :0* :Vow ] ; ! arvattava:arvattavvaa
!2012-11-18!         # Cns* Vow v _ Vow [ Vow 0: Cns ( Cns:0 ) :Vow | Vow %^SyllBr:0 e ] %^StretchSyll2:0 ; ! kevät:kevväen, tavvaara
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! viis: viijes
!2012-11-18! "it:j"
!2012-11-18!  t:j <=> [ i | o ] i _ [ e | o ] %> %^WCns:0 ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "rt:rr weakening"
!2012-11-18! t:r <=>  Vow r _ GRC ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "lt:ll weakening"
!2012-11-18! t:l <=>  Vow l _ GRC ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "nt:nn weakening"
!2012-11-18! t:n <=>  Vow ( %> %^WCns:0 ) n _ GRC ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! p
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "mp:mm weakening"
!2012-11-18! p:m <=> [ :Vow ( %> %^WCns:0 ) | [ a: | ä: ] %> %^WCns:0 %^E1:0 | AÄ1: | Vow+ :Cns+ Vow  %^SyllBr:0 e %^StretchSyll2:0 ] m _ [ GRC | AÄ1: %> %^WCns:0 ( V3: ) Cns | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18!         m _ Vow l %^WGStem:0 ; ! ompel- to ommel-
!2012-11-18! ! [ ( %> ) :Vow ( 0: ) %> %^WCns:0 | Vow:0 %> i: %> %^WCns:0 | Vow:0 %>  %^WCns:0 %> i: %> ] ;
!2012-11-18! !%> %^WCns %^E1 mp
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "nk:ng weakening"
!2012-11-18! k:g <=> [ # ] Cns* Vow n _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! aika: ajan
!2012-11-18! "kToZero"
!2012-11-18! k:0 <=> [  #  Cns* Vow (( r | i | VowNonHigh ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vow :Cns+ :Vow+ k ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18! ![ [ # ] Cns* Vow (( r | i ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vow :Cns+ :Vow+ k ] _ [ Vow: | :Vow | ( Vow ) %> i ] ( %> i: | %^StretchSyll2:0 ) %> %^WCns:0 ;
!2012-11-18!         [ # ] Cns* VowBack i: _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! liika:liijan, reikä:reijän
!2012-11-18! "kToj"
!2012-11-18!  k:j <=> [ # ] Cns* [ VowFront | VowNeutral ] i: _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! mato : maot, ! mato : maool
!2012-11-18! ! tToZero in weak
!2012-11-18! "Double stop:weakens tToZero"
!2012-11-18! t:0 <=> [ # Cns* Vow | # Cns* Vow [ Vow - [ i | u | ü ] ] | Vow h [ ü | u ] ] _  GRC ;
!2012-11-18!         [ # Cns*  Vow+ [ h | (r) t ] | Vow ( %> %^WCns:0 ) t | Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ ( n ) t | Vow t ] _  [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18!         t _ Vow l %^WGStem:0 ; ! ottel- to otel-
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! lupa : luvan
!2012-11-18! "p:v"
!2012-11-18! p:v <=> [ # ] Cns* Vow ( r | l | Vow ) _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! "double pp to p"
!2012-11-18! p:0 <=> [ # Cns* Vow ( m ) p | # Cns* Vow Vow p | Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ p ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! ! Vowel raising
!2012-11-18! "o:u ö:ü in Inf"
!2012-11-18!  Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx: %> v v AÄ1: %^RVow:0 ;
!2012-11-18!            Vx: _ %> v v AÄ1: %^RVow:0 ;
!2012-11-18!           where Vx in (o ö)
!2012-11-18!                 Vy in (u ü) matched ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !
!2012-11-18! !"Disallow WLoss after non-v"
!2012-11-18! !WLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* [ в л | в О1: л ] ] ] %> _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! !"Disallow V3 after two consecutive realized vowels"
!2012-11-18! ! V3: /<= :Vow :0* :Vow :0* _ ;
!2012-11-18! 
!2012-11-18! 
